Utah statutes.
13-20-5.   Reasonable number of attempts to conform.
(1)  It is presumed that a reasonable number of attempts have been undertaken
to conform a motor vehicle to the applicable express warranties, if:
(a)  the same nonconformity has been subject to repair four or more times by
the manufacturer, its agent, or its authorized dealer within the express
warranty term or during the one-year period following the date of original
delivery of the motor vehicle to a consumer, whichever is earlier, but the
nonconformity continues to exist; or
(b)  the vehicle is out of service to the consumer because of repair for a
cumulative total of 30 or more business days during the warranty term or
during the one-year period, whichever is earlier.
(2)  The term of an express warranty, the one-year period, and the 30-day
period shall be extended by any period of time during which repair services
are not available to the consumer because of a war, invasion, strike, fire,
flood, or other natural disaster.
